District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-301.08

Panel on Rates and Rules; quorum; rule and ratemaking requirements.

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-97, § 9, 33 DCR 703
May 10, 1988, D.C. Law 7-109, § 2(c), 35 DCR 2181
Sept. 22, 1994, D.C. Law 10-171, § 2(a), 41 DCR 5149
Oct. 22, 2012, D.C. Law 19-184, § 2(i), 59 DCR 9431
1981 Ed., § 40-1708.
2001 Ed., § 50-308.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of D.C. Law 19-184, § 7, see § 7007 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 24(b) of D.C. Law 6-97 provided that sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 20, 21, 22, and 23 shall take effect 1 year after March 25, 1986.
Section 7001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle A of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Subject to Appropriations Repealers Amendment Act of 2013”.

Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-184 provided that the act shall apply upon the inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.

Section 7007 of D.C. Law 20-61 repealed D.C. Law 19-184, § 7.